Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1005
Applicability of act.

(1) The Online Age Verification Liability Act shall not apply to any news-gathering organization or any bona fide news or public interest broadcast, website video, or report.

(2) An Internet utility does not violate the Online Age Verification Liability Act solely by providing access or connection to or from a website or other information or content on the Internet or a facility, system, or network not under the Internet utility's control, including transmitting, downloading, or storing data or providing access, to the extent that such Internet utility is not responsible for the creation of the content that constitutes material harmful to minors.

Laws 2024, LB1092, § 5.
July 19, 2024